Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 29. Persons with Disabilities

§ 43-29-1.
Persons with disabilities.

For the purpose of providing assistance for permanently totally disabled needy people under the age of (sixty-five) 65 years and over the age of (eighteen) 18 years who are unable to work, a statewide system of assistance is hereby established and shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of the state, to operate with due regard to varying conditions and cost of living, to be financed by state appropriations therefor, and to be administered by the state department of public welfare, as hereinafter provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7270; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 526, § 1.

§ 43-29-3.
Eligibility for assistance to the needy aged; eligibility for assistance to needy persons with disabilities.

Assistance shall be given under this chapter to any person who qualifies under Section 43-29-1, and who:

has resided in this state for one (1) year immediately preceding his application, and such residence shall not have been established solely or in part for the purpose of enabling the applicant to come within the provisions of this chapter;

resides in the county in which application is made;

has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health;

is not an inmate of or being maintained by any county, municipal, state, or national institution at the time of receiving assistance except as a patient in a public medical institution, or is not a patient in any institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases, or is not a patient in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis; in the event the federal Social Security Act or other appropriate federal statutes are so amended as to permit funds appropriated by Congress to be used for assistance to disabled persons who are inmates of public institutions, then being an inmate of any such institution shall not disqualify any such person for assistance. An inmate of such an institution may, however, make application for such assistance but the assistance, if granted, shall not begin until after he ceases to be an inmate;

has not made an assignment to transfer his property so as to render himself eligible for assistance under this chapter at any time within two (2) years immediately prior to the filing of an application for assistance pursuant to the provisions hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7271; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 2; Laws, 1954, ch. 354; Laws, 1960, ch. 439, § 3.

§ 43-29-5.
Amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance, including vendor payments for medical care, which any recipient shall receive shall be determined by the welfare department with due regard to resources, income (except such income as may be disregarded as specified in the federal Social Security Act, as amended), and necessary expenditures of the individual and the conditions existing in each case, and in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7272; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 3; Laws, 1944, ch. 293, § 1; Laws, 1950, ch. 526, § 2; Laws, 1957, Ex Sess, ch. 21; Laws, 1960, ch. 441; Laws, 1962, ch. 561, § 1; Laws, 1962, 2d Ex Sess, ch. 34; Laws, 1968, ch. 562, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved July 30, 1968).

§ 43-29-7.
Application for assistance.

Application for assistance under this chapter shall be made to the county welfare agent of the county in which the applicant resides. The application shall be made in writing or reduced to writing in the manner and upon the form prescribed by the state department. Such application shall contain such information as may be prescribed by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7273; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 4.

§ 43-29-9.
Investigation of applications.

Whenever a county welfare agent receives an application for assistance under this chapter, an investigation and record shall promptly be made of the circumstances of the applicant to ascertain the facts supporting the application made under this chapter, and such other information as may be required by the rules of the state board. The county department and the state department shall have the power to conduct examinations, and the county board and such officers and employees as are designated by the state commissioner may also administer oaths and affirmation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7274; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 5.

§ 43-29-11.
Granting of assistance.

Upon the completion of the investigation, the county department shall determine in accordance with the rules and regulations of the State Department, whether the applicant is eligible for assistance under the provisions of this chapter, the amount of assistance he shall receive, and the date upon which such assistance shall begin.

It shall be the duty of the State Department insofar as is practicable to provide assistance to eligible persons, who, due to limitation of available funds have not been placed upon the assistance rolls, as soon as practicable after additional funds become available to the department and prior to making a general increase in assistance grants to persons already on said assistance rolls. Nothing in this section shall be construed to bar or limit any county department of public welfare from granting individual increases in the amount of assistance to recipients based upon their individual needs. The State Department shall, as soon as made possible by the availability of additional funds, take steps to eliminate all waiting lists.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7275; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 6.

§ 43-29-13.
Payment for benefit of recipient.

If the recipient or applicant is found incapable of taking care of himself or his money, payments may be paid to any person, firm, corporation, association, institution or agency designated to receive it by order of the county department of his county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7276; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 7, 1962, ch. 561, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 43-29-15.
Assistance not assignable.

No assistance given under this chapter shall be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under this chapter shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7277; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 8.

§ 43-29-17.
Appeal to the State Department.

The county department shall at once report to the State Department its decision upon each application. If an application is not acted upon by the county department within thirty (30) days after the filing of the application, or is denied or revoked, the applicant may appeal to the State Department in the manner and form prescribed by rules and regulations. The State Department shall upon receipt of such an appeal give the applicant an opportunity for a fair hearing. The State Department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a county department and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time.

The State Department may make such additional investigations as it may deem necessary and shall make such decision as to the granting of assistance and the amount of assistance to be granted the applicant as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with the provisions of this chapter. All decisions of the State Department shall be binding upon the county department involved and shall be complied with by such county department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7278; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 9.

§ 43-29-19.
Periodic reconsideration and changes in amount of assistance.

All assistance grants made under this chapter shall be reconsidered as frequently as may be required by the rules and regulations of the state board. After such further investigation, the amount of assistance may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the state commissioner or county department finds that the recipient’s circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action. The county department may at any time cancel and revoke assistance for cause and it may for cause suspend assistance for such period as it may deem proper. Whenever assistance is thus withdrawn, revoked, suspended or in any way changed, the county department shall at once report to the State Department such decision together with the record of its investigation. All such decisions shall be subject to review by the state commissioner as provided in Section 43-29-17.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7279; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 10.

§ 43-29-21.
No fees to be paid.

No person shall make any charge or receive any fee for representing any applicant or recipient of assistance in any proceeding hereunder except as to criminal proceedings brought pursuant to Section 43-29-23 of this chapter; or with respect to any application whether such fee or charge be paid by the applicant or recipient or by any other person or persons. Any violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor and be punishable as provided in Section 43-29-23.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7281; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 12.

§ 43-29-23.
Fraudulent acts.

Whoever obtains, or attempts, or aids, or abets any person to obtain by means of a wilfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device:

assistance to which he is not entitled; or

assistance greater than that to which he is justly entitled, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or be imprisoned for not more than three (3) months, or be both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court. In assessing the penalty, the court shall take into consideration the amount of money fraudulently received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7282; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 13.

§ 43-29-25.
Recovery from the estate of recipient for false representation.

On the death of any recipient double the total amount of assistance paid to such recipient under this chapter shall be allowed as a claim against the estate of such person if it be found that such recipient has obtained funds by false representation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7280; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 11.

§ 43-29-27.
Limitation of chapter.

All assistance granted under this chapter shall be deemed to be granted and to be held subject to the provisions of any amending or repealing act that may be hereafter passed, and no recipient shall have any claim for compensation, or otherwise, by reason of his assistance being affected in any way by amending or repealing chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7283; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 14.

§ 43-29-29.
Disbursement of funds, how made.

The State Department shall issue all checks for administrative expenses, and for assistance to persons qualifying for aid under the provisions of this chapter. All such checks shall be drawn upon funds made available to the state department of public welfare by the state auditor, upon requisition of the commissioner, approved by the state board. It is the purpose of this section to provide that the state auditor shall transfer, in lump sums, amounts to the state department of public welfare for disbursement under the regulations which shall be made by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7284; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 15.

§ 43-29-31.
Limitation of assistance and administrative cost.

The total amount of assistance granted under the provisions of this chapter and the expenses incurred thereunder shall not exceed the amounts of funds appropriated therefor by the legislature.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7285; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 16.

§ 43-29-33.
Litigation.

No suit shall be maintained in any court for the purpose of compelling an award of assistance or to enforce payment of any award of assistance made under the provisions of this chapter. Awards made hereunder shall in no case create any vested or other rights for assistance in the recipients.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7286; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 17.

§ 43-29-35.
Reservation of right to amend or repeal chapter.

The Legislature reserves the right to amend or repeal all or any part of this chapter at any time; and there shall be no vested private right of any kind against such amendment or repeal. All the rights, benefits, or immunities conferred by this chapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of the legislature to amend or repeal this chapter at any time.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7288; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 19.

§ 43-29-37.
Administration.

The administration of this chapter, so far as applicable, shall be subject to all of the rules and regulations as prescribed by the state board of public welfare for the administration of old age assistance, as provided by Sections 43-1-1 through 43-1-17, and 43-9-1 through 43-9-45, and such other reasonable rules and regulations as may hereafter be promulgated by said board, for the proper administration of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7289; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 20.

§ 43-29-39.
Funds.

Assistance for disabled persons granted under this chapter shall be paid out of any funds designated by the state legislature for this purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7290; Laws, 1942, ch. 282, § 21.